District of Columbia statutes.
2-215.03

Repealed

District of Columbia Local Business Opportunity Commission  ‐ Established; composition; appointment; term of office; qualifications; vacancies; removal; oath of office; compensation.

Repealed.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 4, 23 DCR 9532b
Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-91, § 3, 27 DCR 3280
Aug. 1, 1985, D.C. Law 6-15, § 3(a), 32 DCR 3570
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 117(a), 47 DCR 520
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 6, 49 DCR 8140
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2382(a), 52 DCR 7503
1981 Ed., § 1-1143.
1973 Ed., § 1-853.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2382(a), (c) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Section 2382(c) of D.C. Law 16-33 provided: “(c) An order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law repealed by this section shall remain in effect under the corresponding provision enacted by this subtitle subtitle N of title II, §§ 2301 to 2391, of D.C. Law 16-33 until repealed, amended, or superseded.”.